Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.165

Applicants—Permanent residents.

A general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency may consider the application of a citizen of the United States or a lawful permanent resident for any office, place, position, or employment within the agency.

[ 2024 c 11 s 1.]